Utah statutes.
51-9-410.   Statewide Warrant Operations Account -- Share of surcharge --
Use.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the Statewide Warrant Operations Account.
(2)  The Division of Finance shall allocate 2.5% of the collected surcharge
established under Section 51-9-401, but not to exceed the amount appropriated
by the Legislature, to this account.
(3)  The Legislature may appropriate money from the restricted account to the
Department of Public Safety to pay for statewide warrant system costs incurred
under Section 53-10-208.
